Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 2. Counties, Cities, Towns and School Districts

§ 36-6-201.
Authority to lease or otherwise contract.

The governing body of any county, city, town or school district authorized to acquire and hold real property, may, upon determining that such action will be in the best interests of such county, city, town or school district, lease any lands owned in fee by such county, city, town or school district, for the exploration for and development and production of oil, gas or other hydrocarbons, and otherwise contract for such exploration, development and production, upon such terms as such governing body may determine and as are not inconsistent with the provisions of this act [§§

36-6-201

through

36-6-204

]; providing the exploration for, development and production of oil, gas or other hydrocarbons shall in no way interfere with the public use of said lands or the purpose for which said lands were acquired.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 86, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 24-901; W.S. 1957, § 36-79.

§ 36-6-202.
Power to modify or change leases or contracts.

Any such governing body may, by such lease or contract or by other agreement, include, or provide for the inclusion of, the lands of such county, city, town or school district, or any part or portion of such lands, with other lands in any plan or agreement for cooperative or unit development or operation for oil, gas or other hydrocarbons, and modify and change any and all terms of any lease or contract heretofore entered into or hereafter entered into under the provisions of this act [§§

36-6-201

through

36-6-204

], including the extension of the term of any such lease or contract for the full period of time such cooperative or unit plan or agreement may remain in effect, as required to conform the terms of any such lease or contract to such cooperative or unit plan or agreement.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 86, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 24-902; W.S. 1957, § 36-80.

§ 36-6-203.
Rules and regulations; requisites of leases or contracts.

Any such governing body may, in its discretion, make and establish such rules and regulations governing the issuance of such leases and contracts as are not inconsistent with the provisions of this act [§§

36-6-201

through

36-6-204

]. Any such lease or contract:

Shall be entered into pursuant to resolution duly adopted by the governing body;

May cover parcels of land of such size and shape as the governing body may determine;

May be for a term not exceeding ten (10) years and as long thereafter as oil, gas or other hydrocarbons shall be, or can be, produced in commercial quantities from the lands included in such lease, except as such term may be extended pursuant to the provisions of W.S.

36-6-202

; and

Shall reserve to the governing body a royalty of not less than one-eighth of all oil, gas or other hydrocarbons produced from said lands.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 86, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 24-903; W.S. 1957, § 36-81.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 36-6-204.
Existing leases, contracts and agreements validated.

Nothing in this act [§§

36-6-201

through

36-6-204

] contained shall operate or be construed as in anywise limiting or affecting the power or authority of the governing body of any county, city, town, or school district, to have entered into any lease or contract for the exploration for the development and production of oil, gas or other hydrocarbons, or any agreement for cooperative or unit development or operation for oil, gas or other hydrocarbons, entered into by such governing body prior to the passage of this act, and all such leases, contracts and agreements previously entered into in substantial compliance with the above provision are hereby validated and confirmed.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 86, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 24-904; W.S. 1957, § 36-82.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1949, ch. 86, § 5, makes the act effective from and after passage. Approved February 24, 1949.